Nebraska, session 109, LB1085.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1085 LB1085
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 53-103.47, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
53-103.47 Bottle club means an operation, whether formally organized
as a club having a regular membership list, dues, officers, and meetings
or not, keeping and maintaining premises where persons who have made
their own purchases of alcoholic liquor congregate to consume alcoholic
liquor in or upon the premises for the express purpose of consuming
alcoholic liquor upon the payment of a fee or other consideration.
Sec. 2. Section 53-132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-132 (1) If no hearing is required pursuant to subdivision (1)(a)
or (b) of section 53-133 and the commission has no objections pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of such section, the commission may waive the forty-
five-day objection period and, if not otherwise prohibited by law, cause
a retail license, bottle club license, craft brewery license, or
microdistillery license to be signed by its chairperson, attested by its
executive director over the seal of the commission, and issued in the
manner provided in subsection (4) of this section as a matter of course.
(2) A retail license, bottle club license, craft brewery license, or
microdistillery license may be issued to any qualified applicant if the
commission finds that (a) the applicant is fit, willing, and able to
properly provide the service proposed within the city, village, or county
where the premises described in the application are located, (b) the
applicant can conform to all provisions and requirements of and rules and
regulations adopted pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, (c) the
applicant has demonstrated that the type of management and control to be
exercised over the premises described in the application will be
sufficient to insure that the licensed business can conform to all
provisions and requirements of and rules and regulations adopted pursuant
to the act, and (d) the issuance of the license is or will be required by
the present or future public convenience and necessity.
-2-

LB1085 LB1085
2026 2026
(3) In making its determination pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section the commission shall consider:
(a) The recommendation of the local governing body;
(b) Evidence submitted by the applicant for a retail license under
subdivision (2)(b) of section 53-133 that the city, village, or county
issuing a recommendation of denial for an application acted arbitrarily
and capriciously;
(c) (b) The existence of a citizens' protest made in accordance with
section 53-133;
(d) (c) The existing population of the city, village, or county and
its projected growth;
(e) (d) The nature of the neighborhood or community of the location
of the proposed licensed premises;
(f) (e) The existence or absence of other retail licenses, bottle
club licenses, craft brewery licenses, or microdistillery licenses with
similar privileges within the neighborhood or community of the location
of the proposed licensed premises and whether, as evidenced by
substantive, corroborative documentation, the issuance of such license
would result in or add to an undue concentration of licenses with similar
privileges and, as a result, require the use of additional law
enforcement resources;
(g) (f) The existing motor vehicle and pedestrian traffic flow in
the vicinity of the proposed licensed premises;
(h) (g) The adequacy of existing law enforcement;
(i) (h) Zoning restrictions;
(j) (i) The sanitation or sanitary conditions on or about the
proposed licensed premises; and
(k) (j) Whether the type of business or activity proposed to be
operated in conjunction with the proposed license is and will be
consistent with the public interest; and .
(l) Whether the applicant or any affiliated entities of the
-3-

LB1085 LB1085
2026 2026
applicant are delinquent on any federal, state, or local taxes. For
purposes of this subdivision, affiliated entities means any other
corporation, partnership, or limited liability company that holds a
liquor license under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act of which such
applicant has an ownership interest in.
(4) Retail licenses, bottle club licenses, craft brewery licenses,
or microdistillery licenses issued or renewed by the commission shall be
mailed or delivered electronically to:
(a) The clerk of the city, village, or county who shall deliver the
same to the licensee upon receipt from the licensee of proof of payment
of (i) the license fee if by the terms of subsection (6) of section
53-124 the fee is payable to the treasurer of such city, village, or
county, (ii) any fee for publication of notice of hearing before the
local governing body upon the application for the license, (iii) the fee
for publication of notice of renewal as provided in section 53-135.01,
and (iv) occupation taxes, if any, imposed by such city, village, or
county except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section; or
(b) The licensee, upon confirmation from the clerk of the city,
village, or county that the necessary fees and taxes described in
subdivision (4)(a) of this section have been received by the clerk of
such city, village, or county.
(5) Notwithstanding any ordinance or charter power to the contrary,
no city, village, or county shall impose an occupation tax on the
business of any person, firm, or corporation licensed under the act and
doing business within the corporate limits of such city or village or
within the boundaries of such county in any sum which exceeds two times
the amount of the license fee required to be paid under the act to obtain
such license.
(6) Each license shall designate the name of the licensee, the place
of business licensed, and the type of license issued.
(7) Class J retail licensees shall not be subject to occupation
-4-

LB1085 LB1085
2026 2026
taxes under subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 53-133, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-133 (1) The commission shall set for hearing before it any
application for a retail license, bottle club license, craft brewery
license, or microdistillery license relative to which it has received:
(a) Within forty-five days after the date of receipt of such
application by the city, village, or county clerk, a recommendation of
denial from the city, village, or county;
(b) Within ten days after the receipt of a recommendation from the
city, village, or county, or, if no recommendation is received, within
forty-five days after the date of receipt of such application by the
city, village, or county clerk, objections in writing by not less than
three persons residing within such city, village, or county, protesting
the issuance of the license. Withdrawal of the protest does not prohibit
the commission from conducting a hearing based upon the protest as
originally filed and making an independent finding as to whether the
license should or should not be issued;
(c) Within forty-five days after the date of receipt of such
application by the city, village, or county clerk, objections by the
commission or any duly appointed employee of the commission, protesting
the issuance of the license; or
(d) An indication on the application that the location of a proposed
retail or bottle club establishment is within one hundred fifty feet of a
church as described in subsection (2) of section 53-177 and a written
request by the church for a hearing.
(2)(a) (2) Hearings upon such applications shall be in the following
manner: Notice indicating the time and place of such hearing shall be
mailed or electronically delivered to the applicant, the local governing
body, each individual protesting a license pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)
of this section, and any church affected as described in subdivision (1)
-5-

LB1085 LB1085
2026 2026
(d) of this section, at least fifteen days prior to such hearing. The
notice shall state that the commission will receive evidence for the
purpose of determining whether to approve or deny the application.
Mailing or electronic delivery to the attorney of record of a party shall
be deemed to fulfill the purposes of this section. The commission may
receive evidence, including testimony and documentary evidence, and may
hear and question witnesses concerning the application. The commission
shall not use electronic delivery with respect to an applicant, a
protestor, or a church under this section without the consent of the
recipient to electronic delivery.
(b) Following a hearing pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, the commission may approve an application for a retail license
that received a recommendation of denial from a city, village, or county
if the proposed licensed premises for such retail license application
does not include an area with a craft brewery or microdistillery license
and the applicant proves that the city, village, or county issuing the
recommendation of denial acted arbitrarily and capriciously in making the
determination.
Sec. 4. Section 53-1,100, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-1,100 (1) Any person (a) who imports alcoholic liquor for
distribution as a wholesaler or distributes or sells alcoholic liquor,
other than sale at retail, at any place within the state without having
first obtained a valid license to do so under the Nebraska Liquor Control
Act, (b) who manufactures alcoholic liquor other than spirits within the
state without having first obtained a valid license to do so under the
act, (c) who makes any false statement or otherwise violates any of the
provisions of the act in obtaining any license under the act, (d) who,
having obtained a license under the act, violates any of the provisions
of the act with respect to the manufacture, possession, distribution, or
sale of alcoholic liquor or with respect to the maintenance of the
-6-

LB1085 LB1085
2026 2026
licensed premises, or (e) who violates any other provision of the act for
which a penalty is not otherwise provided, shall for a first offense be
guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and for a second or subsequent offense
shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who (a) manufactures spirits at any place within the
state or (b) sells alcoholic liquor at retail without having first
obtained a valid license to do so under the act shall be guilty of a
Class I misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class IV felony for a
second or subsequent offense.
(3) Each day any person engages in business as a manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or bottle club in violation of the act shall
constitute a separate offense.
(4) In any prosecution in which a person is charged with an offense
arising out of the failure to obtain a valid license as provided in
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) or subsection (2) of this section, evidence of
the failure of the accused to produce such license upon demand shall
constitute prima facie proof that a license has not been issued by the
commission to such person.
Sec. 5. Original sections 53-103.47, 53-133, and 53-1,100, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 53-132, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-